District of Columbia statutes.
7-751.08

Loan repayment.

(a)

Physicians and dentists shall be eligible to have 100% of their total debt, not to exceed $120,000, repaid by the Program over 4 years of service. For each year of participation, the Program will repay loan amounts according to the following schedule:

(1)

For the 1st year of service, 18% of their total debt, not to exceed $21,600;

(2)

For the 2nd year of service, 26% of their total debt, not to exceed $31,200;

(3)

For the 3rd year of service, 28% of their total debt, not to exceed $33,600; and

(4)

For the 4th year of service, 28% of their total debt, not to exceed $33,600.

(b)

Other health professionals shall be eligible to have 100% of their total debt, not to exceed $66,000, repaid by the Program over 4 years of service. For each year of participation, the Program will repay loan amounts according to the following schedule:

(1)

For the 1st year of service, 18% of their total debt, not to exceed $11,800;

(2)

For the 2nd year of service, 26% of their total debt, not to exceed $17,200;

(3)

For the 3rd year of service, 28% of their total debt, not to exceed $18,500;

(4)

For the 4th year of service, 28% of their total debt, not to exceed $18,500.

(c)

The Director is permitted to increase the dollar amount of the total loan repayment annually to adjust for inflation. All quarterly disbursements shall be adjusted accordingly.

History

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-71, § 9, 53 DCR 61